Hawaii statutes.
§286-131 Unlawful use of license. No
person shall:

(1) Display or permit to be displayed or have in the
person's possession any canceled, revoked, suspended, fictitious, or
fraudulently altered driver's license;

(2) Lend the person's driver's license to any other
person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another;

(3) Display or represent as one's own any driver's
license not issued to the person;

(4) Fail or refuse to surrender to the examiner of
drivers, upon the examiner's lawful demand, any driver's license that has been
suspended, revoked, or canceled;

(5) Use a false or fictitious name in any application
for a driver's license or knowingly make a false statement or knowingly conceal
a material fact, or otherwise commit a fraud in any such application; or

(6) Use or have in the person's possession any
reproduction, imitation, or facsimile of any driver's license or any
identification with the appearance of a driver's license. [L 1937, c 234, §28;
RL 1945, §7329; RL 1955, §160-61; HRS §286-131; am L 1970, c 164, §3; gen ch
1985; am L 1994, c 46, §1; am L 1996, c 169, §1; am L 2001, c 230, §2; am L
2002, c 224, §3; am L 2004, c 2, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next